Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 25
LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 43-2501. Short title.

Chapter 25, title 43, Idaho Code, shall be known and cited as the “Local Improvement District Code for Irrigation Districts.”

§ 43-2502. Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for the purposes of this chapter, have the meanings respectively given herein.

“Board” means the board of directors of an irrigation district.

“Costs and expenses” mean the contract price of all improvements, including any costs or expenses incurred for engineering, clerical, printing and legal services as well as for advertising, surveying, inspection of work, collection of assessments, interest upon bonds or warrants, and an amount for contingencies as shall be considered necessary by the board.

“District or irrigation district” means irrigation districts organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1, title 43, Idaho Code.

“Engineer” means the official engineer of the irrigation district or one specially retained for purposes of operating under the provisions of this chapter.

“Local improvement district” means a local improvement district created within the boundaries of an irrigation district or irrigation districts under the authority of this chapter.

“Owner” or “owners” mean the owner of property within the limits of a local improvement district, or a proposed local improvement district; and a corporation, joint stock association, partnership, individual proprietor or other form of business enterprise owning real property, within any such district or proposed district.

“Secretary,” “treasurer” or “other irrigation district officer” means the appropriate irrigation district officers with regard to irrigation district local improvement districts.

§ 43-2503. Powers conferred.

The board shall have the power to make or cause to be made any one (1) or more, or combination of, the following improvements:

To acquire, construct, operate, maintain, repair and replace pumping stations and pipelines and all necessary fittings, controls, components and equipment and other water facilities for the purpose of supplying water under pressure or by gravity flow for the irrigation of a described area within the boundaries of the district.

To acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair parks and other recreational facilities;

To remove any nonconforming existing facility or structure in the areas to be improved;

To construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair optional improvements;

To acquire by purchase, gift, condemnation, or otherwise, any real or personal property within the limits of the district as in the judgment of the board may be necessary or convenient in order to make any of such improvements;

To make any other improvements now or hereafter authorized by any other law, the cost of which in whole or in part can properly be determined to be of particular benefit to a particular area within the district;

To construct and install all such structures, equipment and other items and to do all such other work and to incur any such costs and expenses as may be necessary or appropriate to complete any of such improvements in a proper manner.

For the purpose of making and paying for all or a part of the cost of any of such improvements, including optional improvements, the board may create local improvement districts pursuant to this chapter within the boundaries of the irrigation district, levy assessments on the property within such a district which is benefited by the making of the improvements and issue interim or registered warrants and local improvement bonds as provided in this chapter.

§ 43-2504. Initiation of organization of local improvement district.

The organization of any local improvement district herein provided for may be initiated upon a petition signed by not less than sixty percent (60%) of the owners of property subject to assessment within such local improvement district, or by resolution of the board adopted by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the full board at a regular or special meeting thereof. The terms of a petition shall include a description of the boundaries of a proposed local improvement district, the improvements to be made and the property to be assessed.

The board may, in its discretion, authorize a preliminary study to determine the feasibility and costs and expenses of a proposed local improvement district and pay for such study out of the general fund of the district. In the event the local improvement district is formed, the cost of the study may be included in the cost of the local improvement district and added to the assessment roll. In the event the local improvement district is not formed, for any reason, the board may authorize the cost of the study to be added to the general assessment rolls of the district as to the property within the proposed local improvement district.

In the alternative, the board may, in its discretion, as a condition of the board proceeding further with the formation of the local improvement district, require the petitioners to provide to the district a deposit in an amount determined in the board’s discretion to pay for a preliminary study of the proposed local improvement district to determine the feasibility and costs and expenses of the project.

The petition shall include an acknowledgment by the petitioners that the district may require the petitioners to provide to the district a deposit in an amount determined in the board’s discretion to pay for a preliminary study or that the board may, in its discretion, authorize the cost of the study to be paid out of the general fund of the district, with the cost of the study to be included in the cost of the local improvement district and added to the assessment roll if one is formed or to be added to the general assessment rolls of the district as to the property within the proposed local improvement district if the local improvement district is not formed.

§ 43-2505. Resolution of intention to create district.

Upon the filing of a petition or upon initiation of a local improvement district by board action, the board shall, at a regular or special meeting, adopt a resolution giving notice of its intention to create the local improvement district, to make the improvements and to levy assessments to pay all or a part thereof. The notice shall contain:

A description of the boundaries of the local improvement district to be created and the property to be assessed, sufficient to inform the owners thereof that their property is to be assessed.

A general description of the improvements contemplated, together with an estimate of the total cost and expenses of the same, and a statement of the percentage or other calculation of the total cost and expenses of the improvements which will be paid from a levy of assessments on property benefited and the percentage or calculation of the total costs and expenses, if any, which will be paid from the general funds of the district or from such other source specified in the notice.

A statement that the costs and expenses of the improvements will be assessed against the lots and lands to which irrigation water shall be delivered from the main system of the district to the lots and lands benefited by such improvements and included in the local improvement district to be created according to a gross acreage method, and the board shall state the method in said notice.

A statement that the local improvement district is to be an enlarged local improvement district within the meaning of this act, if the same is true, and the boundaries of such enlarged local improvement district shall be given.

A statement of the time within which and the place at which protests shall be filed and of the time and place at which the board will conduct a public hearing to consider such protests.

§ 43-2506. Notice of intention and hearing.

The notice of intention shall be published in the official newspaper of the district. If the district is located in more than one (1) county, the notice of intention may be published only in the county where the property to be assessed in the proposed local improvement district is located. Publication shall be in three (3) consecutive issues if a daily newspaper, or in two (2) issues if a weekly newspaper or in case no newspaper is published in such district then by posting for five (5) days in three (3) public places within the proposed local improvement district. A copy of such notice shall be mailed to each owner of property, if known, or his agent, if known, within the limits of the proposed local improvement district, addressed to such person at his post office address if known, or if unknown, to a post office in the district where the improvement is to be made. Ownership of property shall be determined as of the date of the adoption of the resolution of intent to create. The hearing shall take place not less than ten (10) days from the date of the first of said publications or postings or the date of said mailing, whichever is later.

§ 43-2507. Protests and hearings.

Any owner of property to be assessed in the proposed local improvement district described in the notice of intention shall have the right, in advance of the hearing, to file, in writing, a protest to the creation of the district or making any other objections in relation thereto. At the date, time and place specified in the notice of intention the board shall, in open and public session, consider all protests which have been filed in writing in advance of the hearing, and the hearing may be adjourned one (1) or more times at the discretion of the board to a fixed future time and place for the same, by publicly announcing at the hearing the continued date and time for such hearing, until all such protests have been heard. No further or additional notice of any kind shall be required. At any continued hearing, the board shall not consider any protests that were filed after the original hearing date. The decision of the board as to all protests shall be conclusive and final, and if it should so determine, the board may delete any improvements on any property which had originally been contemplated in the said notice. If owners of more than two-thirds (2/3) of the property to be assessed protest any of the proposed improvements which affect their property, the board shall not proceed further with the work so protested unless a majority of the members of the full board shall vote to proceed with such work. The vote on the hereinafter mentioned resolution creating the local improvement district shall constitute the vote as to whether or not the board will proceed. Any property owner who fails to file a protest within the time specified, or having filed one withdraws said protest, shall be deemed to have waived any objection to the creation of the local improvement district, the making of the improvements, and the inclusion of his property in the local improvement district. Such waiver shall not preclude his right to object to the amount of the assessment at the later hearing provided for such purpose.

In cases where written protests are filed and sixty percent (60%) of the owners or the owners of two-thirds (2/3) of the lots and lands within such proposed local improvement district have signed such protest, the board shall not be allowed to proceed with the creation of the local improvement district for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days.

After expiration of the one hundred eighty (180) day period, the district may recommence the initiation of a local improvement district as originally proposed or as modified as provided in this chapter.

§ 43-2508. Resolution creating local improvement district and procedure for construction bids.

If, after the hearing on the creation of the district, the board finds that the local improvement district will be for the best interest of the property affected and the district; that there is reasonable probability that the obligations of such local improvement district will be paid; and the value of the property within the proposed local improvement district is sufficient; it shall then adopt a resolution providing for such improvements and creating a local improvement district to be called “Local Improvement District No. ... for ............ Irrigation District, Idaho,” which shall include all of the property within said local improvement district in accordance with the findings of the board, and said resolution shall set forth the boundaries of the local improvement district, provide the improvements which shall be made, and state that the total cost and expenses thereof shall be assessed according to the percentage or calculation hereinbefore mentioned on all benefited property in the local improvement district by using the gross acreage method of assessment contemplated in the notice of intention subject to any variation therefrom as a result of the board’s determining that the benefits to be derived by certain lots or parcels of property warrant such variations. The board shall appoint an engineer and shall have prepared the necessary plans and specifications for the construction work ordered. Except as hereinafter otherwise provided, the board shall authorize the advertisement for bids therefor by giving notice calling for sealed bids for the construction of the work in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.

Any contract made by a district for any improvements authorized by this code shall be made by the board in the name of the district upon such terms of payment as shall be fixed by the board. The contract shall be authorized by resolution empowering the authorized officer of the district to execute the contract. The resolution need not set out the contract in full but it shall be sufficient if the resolution refers to a copy of the contract on file in the office of the secretary where it is available for public inspection.

Any provision in this local improvement district for irrigation districts code notwithstanding, if any district shall elect to exercise the powers herein granted jointly with another irrigation district or districts, or with any other public agency or agencies as authorized by the provisions of section 67-2328, Idaho Code, the improvements as contemplated within the local improvement district may be constructed jointly and as part of a larger project with such other agency or agencies upon the letting of a single contract after compliance with the required bidding procedure for any Idaho public agency jointly participating in the work.

§ 43-2509. Limitation on assessments against property.

No district shall order any improvement to be paid for by local assessment where the estimated costs of such improvement, if such costs are to be assessed to the property in the local improvement district, or that portion of the estimated costs to be assessed, if a portion only of said total costs are to be assessed, when added to all other outstanding and unpaid local improvement assessments against the property included in the local improvement district, excluding penalties and interest, shall exceed the actual value of the real property in the local improvement district, including the value of the improvements thereon.

The board shall provide, by resolution, the method of determining the actual value of the real property including the improvements thereon in the local improvement district and when the valuation is so determined, such valuation shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud or gross mistake.

§ 43-2510. Preparation of assessment roll and notice of hearing thereon.

After the contract has been awarded and at such time as the board shall determine, the engineer shall prepare a duly certified report to the board showing in detail the total cost and expenses of the improvements and the dollar amounts of the same payable from assessments and from other sources. The report shall also contain a form of assessment roll numbering each assessment, giving the name, if known, of the owner of each lot or parcel of property assessed, and showing the amount chargeable to each lot or parcel of property according to the method of assessment originally contemplated by the board subject to any variations therefrom as a result of the engineer’s recommendation that benefits to be received by any lot or parcel of property warrant such a variation from the method chosen. Each lot or parcel of property shall be described with sufficient clearness to identify it, and if the engineer recommends any variations from the contemplated method of assessment, those variations shall be pointed out and the reasons for the same shall be given in the report.

Upon receipt of the report, the board shall cause the assessment roll contained therein to be filed in the office of the treasurer where it shall be available for public inspection. The board shall thereupon fix a time and place when and where the board will meet in open session and consider the report and the assessment roll and hear all objections to the assessment roll by the property owners of the local improvement district.

§ 43-2511. Notice of hearing on assessment roll.

After the board fixes the time and place for said hearing on the assessment roll, the secretary of the district shall give notice by publication in the official newspaper of such district. If the district is located in more than one (1) county, the notice may be published only in the county where the property to be assessed is located. Publication shall be in three (3) successive issues if published in a daily newspaper, or by publication in two (2) issues if published in a weekly newspaper, the first of which publication shall be at least fifteen (15) days before the date fixed for hearing objections to said assessment roll, that such assessment roll is on file in his office. The notice shall further state the date, time and place at which the board will hear and consider objections to the assessment roll by the parties aggrieved by such assessments. The secretary shall, not less than fifteen (15) days before the date fixed for hearing objections to said assessment roll, mail a substantially similar notice to each owner of property if known, or his agent if known, within the limits of the local improvement district, addressed to such person at his post office address if known, or if unknown, to the post office in such district where the improvement is to be made. The mailed notice shall also state the amount of the individual assessment and that at the specified time and place the board will hold a hearing to hear and determine all objections to the regularity of the proceedings in making such assessment, the correctness of the assessment, and the amount levied on the particular lot or parcel in relation to the benefits accruing thereon and in relation to the proper proportionate share of the total cost of the improvements in the project. It shall further state that each owner of property within the district is given notice that in revising the assessment roll at or after the hearing, the board may increase any assessment or assessments up to twenty percent (20%) of the original amount thereof without giving further notice and holding a new hearing thereon. The owner or owners of any property which is assessed in such assessment roll, whether named or not in such roll, may, before the date and time fixed for the hearing, file with the secretary his objections in writing to said assessment.

§ 43-2512. Hearing objections to assessment roll and confirmation.

At the time appointed for hearing objections to such assessment roll, the board shall consider the engineer’s report and the assessment roll and shall hear and determine all objections which have been filed by any owner of property, or his agent, to the regularity of the proceedings in making such assessment, to the correctness of such assessment, to the amount levied on any particular lot or parcel of land, including the benefits accruing thereon and the proper proportionate share of the total cost of the improvements to be borne thereby and to the inclusion of any lot or parcel of land in the proposed district. The board shall have the power: to adjourn such hearing from time to time and, in its discretion, to revise, correct, conform or set aside any assessment and to order that such assessment be made de novo; and to exclude any lot or parcel of land from an assessment roll which, in the judgment of the board, it finds will not be benefited by improvements to be made. If any assessments are increased in an amount greater than twenty percent (20%) of the amount of the assessments as set out in the notice of the hearing, then a new notice of the hearing shall be given and a new hearing held as aforesaid. No new hearing shall be required in the event that any assessments are decreased in any amount or are increased in an amount up to twenty percent (20%) of the original amount.

§ 43-2513. Confirmation of assessment roll.

After said hearing the board shall pass a resolution confirming the assessment roll as corrected by them in relation to the benefits accruing thereon as a result of the improvements being made. The resolution shall be the final determination of the regularity, validity and correctness of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and of the amount thereof levied on each lot or parcel of land, which resolution shall contain a finding that each lot or parcel of land is benefited to the amount of assessment levied thereon subject to appeal as provided herein. Upon passage of the resolution, the secretary shall certify and file the confirmed assessment roll with the treasurer of the district and the assessments therein shall be due and payable to the treasurer within thirty (30) days from the date of the adoption of the resolution. The confirmed assessment roll and the assessments made by the confirmed assessment roll shall be a lien upon the property assessed from and after the date the following notice is recorded. Immediately upon passage of the confirming resolution the secretary shall file with the county recorder a notice which shall contain the date of the confirming resolution and a description of the area or boundaries of the local improvement district. If any assessment is not paid in full within said thirty (30) day period, such assessment shall become delinquent and shall be collected in the same manner and with the same penalties and interest added thereto as hereinafter provided for delinquent assessments. The board may, in the alternative, determine to make assessments unpaid at the end of said thirty (30) day period payable in installments and to issue and sell registered warrants or installment bonds payable from such unpaid installments as herein provided. If the board chooses to do so, it shall provide in said resolution that any property owner who has not paid his assessment in full within said thirty (30) day period will be conclusively presumed to have chosen to pay the same in installments, and the resolution shall then establish the number of years said installments shall run, the dates of payment of the same and the rate of interest that the unpaid assessments shall bear, which rate shall not be less than the rate of interest borne by the warrants or bonds payable therefrom, said interest running from the date of the passage of the assessment resolution, irrespective of the date of its official publication, and being payable at the same time and place as the installment payments of assessments. Said installments shall be due and payable in not to exceed thirty (30) years to the treasurer or other proper officer as provided by the board. The resolution shall establish the due date of the first installment payment and that the local or special assessments may be carried on the rolls of the district and collected as hereinafter provided. If any installment is not paid within twenty (20) days from the date it is due, the same shall become delinquent and the treasurer shall add a penalty of two percent (2%) thereto. In addition to any other method of collection provided in this code, the board may certify delinquent installments to the treasurer, and when so certified they shall be extended on the assessment rolls and collected as other assessments levied upon lands in the district. In the event that any property owner should choose to pay his assessment in full after such time as it has been conclusively presumed that he will pay in installments, such payment in full shall include the full amount of the unpaid assessment plus penalties and all interest payable on the same plus additional interest thereon at the rate provided in the bonds from the date of the last installment due to one (1) year after the next interest date of said bonds.

Any errors in description, ownership of property or amounts in any assessment resolution adopted pursuant to this section may be corrected by the passage of an amendatory resolution which need set forth only the corrected descriptions or amounts. The passage of such amendatory resolution shall serve only to postpone the thirty (30) day period for payment in full of the assessments actually affected by such amendatory resolution and the due dates of installments of such affected assessments shall be the same as the due dates of installments not affected. Notice of any assessments so affected shall be given in the same manner as hereinafter provided for the giving of notice of assessments.

§ 43-2514. Notice and payment of assessments.

Upon passage of the assessment roll, the treasurer of the district shall mail a postcard or letter to each property owner assessed at his post-office address if known, or if unknown, to the post office in the district where the improvement is being made, stating the total amount of his assessment, plus the substance of the terms of payments of the same as set out in the resolution confirming the assessment roll.

An affidavit of the mailing of the notice shall be filed, before the date of delinquency, in the office of the treasurer in the file of the local improvement district, but the failure of the treasurer to give any notice required in this section or to do any other act or thing required in this section, shall not affect the validity of the assessments or installments thereof due nor extend the time for payment, but shall subject the district to liability to a property owner for any damage sustained by the latter by reason of such failure.

§ 43-2515. Installment docket.

Whenever any improvement bonds or warrants are issued as herein provided, the treasurer shall immediately thereafter mark on the assessment roll of such local improvement district opposite each assessment which has been paid, the word “paid” together with the date of payment, and shall immediately thereafter enter in a docket to be kept for that purpose, known as “local improvement installment docket” under separate heads for each local improvement district, all unpaid assessments as shown on such assessment roll, said docket to be made up from the assessment roll, and shall contain in separate columns the number of the assessment, the name of the owner, the description of the property, the amount of the total assessment, the amount and date when due of each annual installment with interest added, and a blank column in which shall be marked the date of payment of each installment. Such docket shall stand thereafter as a lien docket for such assessments so shown until paid.

§ 43-2516. Appeal procedure — Exclusive remedy.

Any person who properly has filed objections to the assessment roll or any other person who feels aggrieved by the decision of the board in confirming the same shall have the right to appeal to the district court of any county in which the local improvement district or any portion thereof may be situated. Such appeal shall be made within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the resolution confirming the assessment roll by filing a written notice of appeal with the secretary of the district and with the clerk of the district court aforesaid describing the property and objections of the appellant. The appellant shall also provide a bond to the district in a sum to be fixed by the court, but not less than two hundred dollars ($200) with sureties to be approved by the court, conditioned to pay all costs to be awarded to the respondent upon such an appeal. After said thirty (30) day appeal period has run, no one shall have any cause or right of action to contest the legality, formality or regularity of said assessments for any reason whatsoever and, thereafter, said assessments and the liens thereon shall be considered valid and incontestable without limitation.

If an appeal is filed within said period, the case shall be docketed by the clerk of said court in the name of the person taking the appeal against the district as “an appeal from assessments.” Said cause shall then be at issue and have precedence over all civil cases pending in said court, except proceedings under the act relating to eminent domain by cities and actions of forcible entry and detainer. Such appeal shall be tried in said court as in the case of equitable causes except that no pleadings shall be necessary. The judgment of the court shall be either to confirm, modify or annul the assessment insofar as the same affects the property of the appellant, from which judgment an appeal may be taken to the supreme court as provided by law. In case the assessment is confirmed, the fees of the secretary of the district for copies of the record shall be taxed against the appellant with other costs.

§ 43-2517. Additional improvements.

Whenever any assessment is levied on any property for further, separate or additional improvement under the provisions of this code or any law of this state, such assessment shall be a subsequent lien upon the property so assessed to the lien of the unpaid assessments theretofore made for the original improvement. Whenever any assessment is made for such further, separate or additional improvement on property on which an existing assessment has been levied for improvements, such further, separate or additional assessment for improvement shall not be construed or considered as for one and the same improvement, or for the same purpose or for the same benefit, or as a double assessment for improvements against the property being assessed for the payment of the cost and expense of such improvement but shall be considered and construed as a separate, distinct, single and independent improvement on and of benefit to the property so assessed. All assessments so levied or bonds or warrants issued payable from the same shall be considered and construed as assessments levied or bonds or warrants issued for separate, distinct, single and independent improvements and benefits on and to the property so assessed.

§ 43-2518. Reassessment of benefits.

In all cases of assessments for local improvements of any kind against any property wherein said assessments have failed to be valid in whole or in part for want of form or sufficiency, informality, irregularity or nonconformance with the bylaws, resolutions or laws governing such assessments, the board shall be and is hereby authorized to reassess such assessments and to enforce their collection in accordance with the provisions of law existing at the time the reassessment is made. No mistake in description of the property or the name of the owner thereof shall affect the validity of any assessment or any lien created thereby under the provisions of this code, or any law of this state, unless such mistake or error renders it impossible to identify the property so assessed.

When for any cause, mistake or inadvertence, the amount assessed on any property is insufficient to pay the cost and expenses of the improvement made and enjoyed by the owner of such property, it shall be lawful, and the board is hereby directed and authorized, to make reassessments on said property sufficient in amount to pay for such improvements, the reassessment to be made and collected in accordance with the provisions of law existing at the time of its levy.

§ 43-2519. Lien of assessment — Foreclosure.

Assessments levied to pay the cost and expense of any improvement authorized by the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a lien upon and against the property upon which such assessment or assessments are made and levied from and after the date upon which the resolution levying such assessment or assessments is passed, which lien shall be superior to the lien of any mortgage or other encumbrance, whether prior in time or not, and shall constitute such lien until paid, and until paid, such lien shall not be subject to extinguishment for any reason whatsoever, including but not limited to the sale of the property assessed on account of the nonpayment of general taxes or the conveyance of such property by any means to the United States of America, or any agency thereof, the state of Idaho, or any county, city, irrigation district, school district, college district or other public body, agency or taxing unit in said state. When bonds have not been issued and said assessments made payable in installments as herein provided, such assessments shall be collected, or the property therein shall be foreclosed and sold for such assessments and costs, in a suit for that purpose by the district.

Such suit shall be in the name of the district as plaintiff and against any one (1) or more owners of property failing to pay such assessment or assessments as defendants. In any such proceedings where the court, trying the same, shall be satisfied that the improvements have been made or have been contracted for, which according to the true intent of this code would be properly chargeable to such property, a recovery shall be permitted and the lien enforced to the extent of the cost and expenses of the improvement which would be chargeable on such property notwithstanding any informality, irregularity or defect in any of the proceedings of such district or any of its officers, and such property shall be ordered sold for the payment of the assessment or assessments against it and the costs and expenses of such suit including reasonable attorney’s fees to be fixed by the court and prorated to each separate piece of property to be sold.

§ 43-2520. Segregation of assessments.

Whenever any land against which there has been levied any special assessment by any district shall have been sold in part or subdivided, the board of that district shall have the power to order a segregation of the assessment.

Any person desiring to have such a special assessment against a tract of land segregated to apply to smaller parts thereof shall apply to the district which levied the assessment. If the board determines that a segregation should be made, it shall by resolution order the treasurer to make segregation on the original assessment roll of the local improvement district as directed in the resolution and in accordance with section 43-701, Idaho Code. The segregation shall be made as nearly as possible on the same basis as the original assessment was levied, and the total of the segregated parts of the assessment shall equal the assessment before segregation. The resolution shall describe the original tract, the amount and date of the original assessment, and shall define the boundaries of the divided parts and the amount of the assessment chargeable to each part. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the county recorder. The board may require, as a condition to the order of segregation, that the person seeking the segregation pay the district the reasonable engineering and clerical costs incident to making the segregation. No segregation need be made if the board shall find that by such segregation the security of the lien for the assessment will be so jeopardized as to reduce the security for any outstanding local improvement district obligations payable from such assessment.

§ 43-2521. Bonds — Registered warrants — Interim warrants — Election not required.

If the board determines to make assessments payable in installments as is provided in section 43-2515, Idaho Code, it shall by resolution authorize to be issued, in the name of the district, improvement bonds of the local improvement district payable from assessments levied against the property within the local improvement district. Such bonds shall be payable each year from and after the date of the bonds and shall be of such denomination and bear interest, payable annually, at such rate as is determined by the board, but in no event shall such rate of interest be greater than the rate of interest borne by the unpaid assessments.

The bonds shall be in such form and denomination as may be provided by the board and they shall mature serially over a period not exceeding thirty (30) years. The board may reserve the right to redeem any of the bonds at its option on any interest payment at such price or prices as determined by the board. The bonds shall be signed by the president of the district, and shall be countersigned by the treasurer and attested by the secretary of the district. No bond or coupon shall be invalid because an officer whose manual or facsimile signature thereon has ceased to hold office at the time of the delivery of the bonds so long as he held the office at the time such signature was placed on the bond or coupon. The coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signatures of said officers and each bond shall have the seal of the district affixed thereto. Each bond shall provide that the principal thereof and the interest thereon are payable solely from the principal of and interest on the unpaid assessments levied in the local improvement district to pay the total cost and expenses of the project concerned.

In lieu of bonds, registered warrants may be issued under the same circumstances and in the same manner as bonds, such warrants to be issued in payment of any or all costs or expenses of the improvements to the amount said costs or expenses were set out in the engineer’s report. The warrants shall be redeemable in numerical order and further shall be subject to all provisions of this code relating to local improvement bonds so far as the same may be applicable.

If the board shall determine to issue and sell bonds, it may for the purpose of meeting any costs and expenses of making the improvements, as the same are installed prior to the sale of the bonds, issue interim warrants of the local improvement district, payable to the contractor or other proper person upon estimates of the engineer, bearing interest at a rate provided by the board, which interim warrants together with the interest due thereon at the date of the issue of the bonds, shall be redeemed and retired from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or prepayment of assessments.

Bonds issued hereunder shall have all the requisites of negotiable paper under the uniform commercial code, and shall not be invalid for irregularity or defect in the proceedings for their issuance, sale or delivery, and shall be incontestable in the hands of bona fide purchasers or holders for value thereof. Nothing herein contained shall prohibit any district from issuing bonds or warrants in the denomination of one hundred dollars ($100), or an even multiple thereof, except that bond number one (1) of any issue may be of a denomination other than one hundred dollars ($100).